Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.010

Indecent exposure.

(1) A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she intentionally makes any open and obscene exposure of his or her person or the person of another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause reasonable affront or alarm. The act of breastfeeding or expressing breast milk is not indecent exposure.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, indecent exposure is a misdemeanor.

(b) Indecent exposure is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense if the person exposes himself or herself to a person under the age of fourteen years.

(c) Indecent exposure is a class C felony if the person has previously been convicted under this section or of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

[ 2003 c 53 s 92; 2001 c 88 s 2; 1990 c 3 s 904; 1987 c 277 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.010.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Acknowledgment—Declaration—Findings—2001 c 88: See note following RCW 43.70.640.